app/agents/word_discovery/FST/class.nouns.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
 rr rd rdd dj bb dd kk djdj
 ng rn rl rr nj
 [I.Noun] [II.Noun] [III.Noun] [IV.Noun] [V.Noun]
 [GEN] [TURN]
 @P.TYPE.N@ @R.TYPE.N@
 (ku) (rr) (r) (~~)
 
LEXICON Root
NounGenderPreBase ;
NominalPrefixes ;

LEXICON NounGenderPreBase
0:na^ INounBase ;
0:ngal^ IINounBase ;
0:man^ IIINounBase ;
0:kun^ IVNounBase ;
0:0^ VNounBase ;
0:0^ NominalDeverbals ;
0:0^ PlaceNouns ;

LEXICON AllNounClasses
INounBase ;
IINounBase ;
IIINounBase ;
IVNounBase ;
VNounBase ;

LEXICON INounBase
[I.Noun]:bangardi^ NominalSuffixes ;
[I.Noun]:barlek^ NominalSuffixes ;
[I.Noun]:barrken^ NominalSuffixes ;
[I.Noun]:beywurd^ NominalSuffixes ;
[I.Noun]:bininjkobeng^ NominalSuffixes ;
[I.Noun]:birl^ NominalSuffixes ;
[I.Noun]:biwo^ NominalSuffixes ;
[I.Noun]:bulanj^ NominalSuffixes ;
[I.Noun]:djadmud^ NominalSuffixes ;
[I.Noun]:djardawo^ NominalSuffixes ;
[I.Noun]:djinem^ NominalSuffixes ;
[I.Noun]:djirrkku^ NominalSuffixes ;
[I.Noun]:kamarrang^ NominalSuffixes ;
[I.Noun]:kangila^ NominalSuffixes ;
[I.Noun]:kayalak^ NominalSuffixes ;
[I.Noun]:kidjkidj^ NominalSuffixes ;
[I.Noun]:kinbarlen^ NominalSuffixes ;
[I.Noun]:kodjok^ NominalSuffixes ;
[I.Noun]:kohbanj^ NominalSuffixes ;
[I.Noun]:komyak^ NominalSuffixes ;
[I.Noun]:kurl^ NominalSuffixes ;
[I.Noun]:kurrng^ NominalSuffixes ;
[I.Noun]:lakkayen^ NominalSuffixes ;
[I.Noun]:maddorl^ NominalSuffixes ;
[I.Noun]:mardaka^ NominalSuffixes ;
[I.Noun]:marden^ NominalSuffixes ;
[I.Noun]:mardku^ NominalSuffixes ;
[I.Noun]:marladj^ NominalSuffixes ;
[I.Noun]:marlbbe^ NominalSuffixes ;
[I.Noun]:marnde^ NominalSuffixes ;
[I.Noun]:marnkol^ NominalSuffixes ;
[I.Noun]:marrkon^ NominalSuffixes ;
[I.Noun]:momoyak^ NominalSuffixes ;
[I.Noun]:morrorddo^ NominalSuffixes ;
[I.Noun]:mud^ NominalSuffixes ;
[I.Noun]:mung^ NominalSuffixes ;
[I.Noun]:murnungu^ NominalSuffixes ;
[I.Noun]:ngarradjku^ NominalSuffixes ;
[I.Noun]:ngarridj^ NominalSuffixes ;
[I.Noun]:nikud^ NominalSuffixes ;
[I.Noun]:rangem^ NominalSuffixes ;
[I.Noun]:rimadba^ NominalSuffixes ;
[I.Noun]:rin^ NominalSuffixes ;
[I.Noun]:wakadj^ NominalSuffixes ;
[I.Noun]:wamud^ NominalSuffixes ;
[I.Noun]:waran^ NominalSuffixes ;
[I.Noun]:warlah^ NominalSuffixes ;
[I.Noun]:wernwarre^ NominalSuffixes ;
[I.Noun]:yaw^ NominalSuffixes ;
[I.Noun]:yin^ NominalSuffixes ;
[I.Noun]:yuhyungki^ NominalSuffixes ;

LEXICON IINounBase
[II.Noun]:badjan^ NominalSuffixes ;
[II.Noun]:bangardi^ NominalSuffixes ;
[II.Noun]:barrken^ NominalSuffixes ;
[II.Noun]:berddjenj^ NominalSuffixes ;
[II.Noun]:beywurd^ NominalSuffixes ;
[II.Noun]:bininjkobeng^ NominalSuffixes ;
[II.Noun]:birl^ NominalSuffixes ;
[II.Noun]:bulanj^ NominalSuffixes ;
[II.Noun]:daluk^ NominalSuffixes ;
[II.Noun]:djadmud^ NominalSuffixes ;
[II.Noun]:elek^ NominalSuffixes ;
[II.Noun]:kamarrang^ NominalSuffixes ;
[II.Noun]:kangila^ NominalSuffixes ;
[II.Noun]:kinbarlen^ NominalSuffixes ;
[II.Noun]:kodjok^ NominalSuffixes ;
[II.Noun]:kohbanj^ NominalSuffixes ;
[II.Noun]:komyak^ NominalSuffixes ;
[II.Noun]:kordow^ NominalSuffixes ;
[II.Noun]:kunburriyaymi^ NominalSuffixes ;
[II.Noun]:kurrng^ NominalSuffixes ;
[II.Noun]:makkawarri^ NominalSuffixes ;
[II.Noun]:mangiyi^ NominalSuffixes ;
[II.Noun]:marladj^ NominalSuffixes ;
[II.Noun]:mudj^ NominalSuffixes ;
[II.Noun]:murnungu^ NominalSuffixes ;
[II.Noun]:ng^ NominalSuffixes ;
[II.Noun]:ng^ NominalSuffixes ;
[II.Noun]:ngarridj^ NominalSuffixes ;
[II.Noun]:wakadj^ NominalSuffixes ;
[II.Noun]:walngurru^ NominalSuffixes ;
[II.Noun]:wamud^ NominalSuffixes ;
[II.Noun]:wernwarre^ NominalSuffixes ;
[II.Noun]:yaw^ NominalSuffixes ;
[II.Noun]:yod^ NominalSuffixes ;

LEXICON IIINounBase
[III.Noun]:badbirri^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:bardmo^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:barlarra^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:barle^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:barnem^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:barrarn^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:bedde^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:bedje^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:belk^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:berd^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:berlnginj^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:berrk^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:bik^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:binik^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:birdubbirdu^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:biri^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:birliwoldjen^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:birrmurlu^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:bobele^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:bolh^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:bordokorr^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:bornde^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:bowinjku^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:bowk^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:boyberre^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:budbud^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:buled^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:burrangkali^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:burrba^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:burre^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:dak^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:danek^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:dangdang^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:dangnud^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:danj^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:darl^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:dedjmad^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:dem^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:dengeyi^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:diddi^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:dile^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:dirnku^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:djabu^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:djakkorl^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:djalen^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:djarduk^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:djawak^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:djedj^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:djelmi^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:djewk^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:djimdjim^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:djoh^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:djong^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:djumbak^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:djungkurrk^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:djurdurrk^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:djurndum^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:djurrukkumarlba^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:dolhdolh^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:dubang^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:dudjmi^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:dule^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:dulk^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:dulum^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:gkadjarra^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:gkuwil^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:imunak^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:kabo^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:karralarlhmanj^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:karrarndalk^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:karre^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:kebkale^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:kih^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:kimanki^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:kinjdjek^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:kod^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:kodjbang^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:kokkarrng^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:kole^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:kongkong^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:korrko^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:kuladj^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:kumirli^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:kung^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:kurdang^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:kurlurrudj^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:kurndalh^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:labbarl^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:larrh^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:lod^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:lombelng^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:marli^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:me^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:mile^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:mim^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:mobban^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:morlak^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:ngalele^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:ngarre^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:ngukmanj^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:nguy^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:rakel^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:wak^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:wanjdjad^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:welyi^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:werrk^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:wodj^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:wurrk^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:yahyay^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:yende^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:yilk^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:yokkorlomud^ NominalSuffixes ;
[III.Noun]:yunkurr^ NominalSuffixes ;
